New York, session 2025-2026, S608.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 363 of the public authorities law, as amended by 2 chapter 766 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 363. [Annual] Biannual report. (a) The authority shall submit to the 4 governor, to the legislature, to the comptroller and to the director of 5 the budget [on or before the first day of February of each year] biannu- 6 ally a detailed report setting forth its operations and fiscal trans- 7 actions during the [preceding calendar year] covered period with a 8 statement of its financial condition as of the end of such [year] 9 covered period and a statement of all receipts and expenditures during 10 such [year] covered period. Such report shall include detailed informa- 11 tion relating to additional expenditures incurred by the authority as a 12 result of the amendments made to subdivision four of section three 13 hundred fifty-nine of this [chapter] title pursuant to the chapter of 14 the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-two which enacted this sentence. 15 Additionally, such report shall include a list of any contract entered 16 into by such authority in the covered period. 17 (b) For the purposes of this section, "covered period" shall mean the 18 preceding six-month period. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 20 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02484-01-5